Georgia, session 2025_26, HB872.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions regarding health, is amended by revising Code Section 31-1-20, which is reserved,
as follows:
"31-1-20.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Conception' means the process of combining the male sperm with the female ovum,
resulting in a fertilized ovum or zygote.
(2) 'Contraception' means a method of inhibiting the development of a human pregnancy
at any stage prior to conception.
(b) Females have the right to the use of any means of contraception. Reserved."
H. B. 872
- 1 -

LC 33 9791
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 872
- 2 -